California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(b) A nonminor dependent receiving aid pursuant to this chapter, who satisfies the age criteria set forth in subdivision (a), shall meet the legal authority for placement and care by being under a foster care placement order by the juvenile court, or the voluntary reentry agreement as set forth in subdivision (z) of Section 11400, and is otherwise eligible for AFDC-FC payments pursuant to Section 11401. A nonminor who satisfies the age criteria set forth in subdivision (a), and who is otherwise eligible, shall continue to
 receive CalWORKs payments pursuant to Section 11253, Approved Relative Caregiver Funding Program benefits pursuant to Section 11461.3, or, as a nonminor former dependent or ward, aid pursuant to Kin-GAP under Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 11360) or Article 4.7 (commencing with Section 11385) or adoption assistance payments, as specified in Chapter 2.1 (commencing with Section 16115) of Part 4. A nonminor former dependent child or ward of the juvenile court who is receiving AFDC-FC benefits pursuant to Section 11405 and who satisfies the criteria set forth in subdivision (a) is eligible to continue to receive aid as long as the nonminor is otherwise eligible for AFDC-FC benefits under this subdivision. This subdivision applies when one or more of the following conditions exist:

(1) The nonminor is completing secondary education or a program leading to an equivalent credential.

(2) The nonminor is enrolled in an institution that provides
 postsecondary or vocational education.

(3) The nonminor is participating in a program or activity designed to promote, or remove barriers to employment.

(4) The nonminor is employed for at least 80 hours per month.

(5) The nonminor is incapable of doing any of the activities described in paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, due to a medical condition, and that incapability is supported by regularly updated information in the case plan of the nonminor. The requirement to update the case plan under this section does not apply to nonminor former dependents or wards in receipt of Kin-GAP program or Adoption Assistance Program payments.

(c) The county child welfare or probation department, Indian tribe, consortium of tribes, or tribal organization that has entered into an agreement pursuant to Section 10553.1, shall work together with a nonminor dependent who is in foster care on the nonminor dependent’s
 18th birthday and thereafter or a nonminor former dependent receiving aid pursuant to Section 11405, to satisfy one or more of the conditions described in paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (b) and shall certify the nonminor’s applicable condition or conditions in the nonminor’s six-month transitional independent living case plan update, and provide the certification to the eligibility worker and to the court at each six-month case plan review hearing for the nonminor dependent. Relative guardians who receive Kin-GAP payments and adoptive parents who receive adoption assistance payments shall be responsible for reporting to the county welfare agency that the nonminor does not satisfy at least one of the conditions described in subdivision (b). The social worker, probation officer, or tribal entity shall verify and obtain assurances that the nonminor dependent continues to satisfy at least one of the conditions in paragraphs (1) to (5), inclusive, of subdivision (b) at each six-month
 transitional independent living case plan update. The six-month case plan update shall certify the nonminor’s eligibility pursuant to subdivision (b) for the next six-month period. During the six-month certification period, the payee and nonminor shall report any change in placement or other relevant changes in circumstances that may affect payment. The nonminor dependent, or nonminor former dependent receiving aid pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 11405, shall be informed of all due process requirements, in accordance with state and federal law, prior to an involuntary termination of aid, and shall simultaneously be provided with a written explanation of how to exercise their due process rights and obtain referrals to legal assistance. Any notices of action regarding eligibility shall be sent to the nonminor dependent or former dependent, their counsel, as applicable, and the placing worker, in addition to any other payee. Payments of aid pursuant to Kin-GAP under Article 4.5 (commencing with Section
 11360) or Article 4.7 (commencing with Section 11385), adoption assistance payments as specified in Chapter 2.1 (commencing with Section 16115) of Part 4, or aid pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 11405 that are made on behalf of a nonminor former dependent shall terminate subject to the terms of the agreements. Subject to federal approval of amendments to the state plan, aid payments may be suspended and resumed based on changes of circumstances that affect eligibility. Nonminor former dependents, as identified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (aa) of Section 11400, are not eligible for reentry under subdivision (e) of Section 388 as nonminor dependents under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court, but may be eligible for reentry pursuant to Section 388.1 if (1) the nonminor former dependent was receiving or, but for the receipt of Supplemental Security Income benefits or other aid from the federal Social Security Administration, would have received aid under either Kin-GAP pursuant to Article 4.5
 (commencing with Section 11360) or Article 4.7 (commencing with Section 11385) or AFDC-FC pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 11405, or the nonminor was receiving adoption assistance payments, as specified in Chapter 2.1 (commencing with Section 16115) of Part 4, and (2) the nonminor’s former guardian or adoptive parent dies, or no longer provides ongoing support to, and no longer receives benefits on behalf of, the nonminor after the nonminor turns 18 years of age, but before the nonminor turns 21 years of age. Nonminor former dependents requesting the resumption of AFDC-FC payments pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 11405 shall complete the applicable portions of the voluntary reentry agreement, as described in subdivision (z) of Section 11400.

(d) A nonminor dependent may receive all of the payment directly provided that the nonminor is living independently in a supervised placement, as described in subdivision (w) of Section 11400, and that both the youth and the agency
 responsible for the foster care placement have signed a mutual agreement, as defined in subdivision (u) of Section 11400, if the youth is capable of making an informed agreement, that documents the continued need for supervised out-of-home placement, and the nonminor’s and social worker’s or probation officer’s agreement to work together to facilitate implementation of the mutually developed supervised placement agreement and transitional independent living case plan.

(e) Eligibility for aid under this section shall not terminate until the nonminor dependent attains the age criteria, as set forth in subdivision (a), but aid may be suspended when the nonminor dependent no longer resides in an eligible facility, as described in Section 11402, or is otherwise not eligible for AFDC-FC benefits under Section 11401, or terminated at the request of the nonminor, or after a court terminates dependency jurisdiction pursuant to Section 391, delinquency jurisdiction pursuant to Section
 607.2, or transition jurisdiction pursuant to Section 452. AFDC-FC benefits to nonminor dependents may be resumed at the request of the nonminor by completing a voluntary reentry agreement pursuant to subdivision (z) of Section 11400, before or after the filing of a petition filed pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 388 after a court terminates dependency or transitional jurisdiction pursuant to Section 391 or delinquency jurisdiction pursuant to Section 607.2. The county welfare or probation department or Indian tribal entity that has entered into an agreement pursuant to Section 10553.1 shall complete the voluntary reentry agreement with the nonminor who agrees to satisfy the criteria of the agreement, as described in subdivision (z) of Section 11400. The county welfare department or tribal entity shall establish a new child-only Title IV-E eligibility determination based on the nonminor’s completion of the voluntary reentry agreement pursuant to Section 11401.
 Pursuant to Section 11401 and subdivision (g), state AFDC-FC benefits are available if all other criteria are met, if the nonminor is determined ineligible for federal financial participation under subdivision (g) of Section 11401. The beginning date of aid for either federal or state AFDC-FC for a reentering nonminor who is placed in foster care is the date the voluntary reentry agreement is signed or the nonminor is placed, whichever is later. The county welfare department, county probation department, or tribal entity shall provide a nonminor dependent who wishes to continue receiving aid with the assistance necessary to meet and maintain eligibility.

(f) (1) The county having jurisdiction of the nonminor dependent shall remain the county of payment under this section regardless of the youth’s physical residence. Nonminor former dependents receiving aid pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 11405 shall be paid by
 their county of residence. Counties may develop courtesy supervision agreements to provide case management and independent living services by the county of residence pursuant to the nonminor dependent’s transitional independent living case plan. Placements made out of state are subject to the applicable requirements of the Interstate Compact on Placement of Children, pursuant to Part 5 (commencing with Section 7900) of Division 12 of the Family Code.

(2) The county welfare department, county probation department, or tribal entity shall notify all foster youth who attain 16 years of age and are under the jurisdiction of that county or tribe, including those receiving Kin-GAP, and AAP, of the existence of the aid prescribed by this section.

(3) The department shall seek any waiver to amend its Title IV-E State Plan with the Secretary of the United States Department of Health and Human Services necessary to implement this section.

(g) (1) Subject to paragraph (3), a county shall pay the nonfederal share of the cost of extending aid pursuant to this section to eligible nonminor dependents who have reached 18 years of age and who are under the jurisdiction of the county, including AFDC-FC payments pursuant to Section 11401, aid pursuant to Kin-GAP under Article 4.7 (commencing with Section 11385), adoption assistance payments as specified in Chapter 2.1 (commencing with Section 16115) of Part 4, and aid pursuant to Section 11405 for nonminor dependents who are residing in the county as provided in paragraph (1) of subdivision (f). A county shall contribute to the CalWORKs payments pursuant to Section 11253 and aid pursuant to Kin-GAP under Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 11360) at the statutory sharing ratios in effect on January 1, 2012.

(2) Subject to paragraph (3), a county shall pay the nonfederal share of the cost of providing permanent placement services pursuant
 to subdivision (c) of Section 16508 and administering the Aid to Families with Dependent Children Foster Care program pursuant to Section 15204.9. For purposes of budgeting, the department shall use a standard for the permanent placement services that is equal to the midpoint between the budgeting standards for family maintenance services and family reunification services.

(3) (A) (i) Notwithstanding any other law, a county’s required total contribution pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2), excluding costs incurred pursuant to Section 10103.5, shall not exceed the amount of savings in Kin-GAP assistance grant expenditures realized by the county from the receipt of federal funds due to the implementation of Article 4.7 (commencing with Section 11385), and the amount of funding specifically included in the Protective Services Subaccount within the Support Services Account within the Local Revenue Fund 2011, plus any associated growth funding
 from the Support Services Growth Subaccount within the Sales and Use Tax Growth Account to pay the costs of extending aid pursuant to this section.

(ii) A county, at its own discretion, may expend additional funds beyond the amounts identified in clause (i). These additional amounts shall not be included in any cost and savings calculations or comparisons performed pursuant to this section.

(B) Beginning in the 2011–12 fiscal year, and for each fiscal year thereafter, funding and expenditures for programs and activities under this section shall be in accordance with the requirements provided in Sections 30025 and 30026.5 of the Government Code. In addition, the following are available to the counties for the purpose of funding costs pursuant to this section:

(i) The savings in Kin-GAP assistance grant expenditures realized from the receipt of federal funds due to the implementation of Article 4.7 (commencing with Section
 11385).

(ii) The savings realized from the change in federal funding for adoption assistance resulting from the enactment of Public Law 110-351 and consistent with subdivision (d) of Section 16118.

(4) (A) The limit on the county’s total contribution pursuant to paragraph (3) shall be assessed by the State Department of Social Services, in conjunction with the California State Association of Counties, in 2015–16, to determine if it shall be removed. The assessment of the need for the limit shall be based on a determination on a statewide basis of whether the actual county costs of providing extended care pursuant to this section, excluding costs incurred pursuant to Section 10103.5, are fully funded by the amount of savings in Kin-GAP assistance grant expenditures realized by the counties from the receipt of federal funds due to the implementation of Article 4.7 (commencing with Section 11385) and the amount of funding specifically
 included in the Protective Services Subaccount within the Support Services Account within the Local Revenue Fund 2011 plus any associated growth funding from the Support Services Growth Subaccount within the Sales and Use Tax Growth Account to pay the costs of extending aid pursuant to this section.

(B) If the assessment pursuant to subparagraph (A) shows that the statewide total costs of extending aid pursuant to this section, excluding costs incurred pursuant to Section 10103.5, are fully funded by the amount of savings in Kin-GAP assistance grant expenditures realized by the counties from the receipt of federal funds due to the implementation of Article 4.7 (commencing with Section 11385) and the amount of funding specifically included in the Protective Services Subaccount within the Support Services Account within the Local Revenue Fund 2011 plus any associated growth funding from the Support Services Growth Subaccount within the Sales and Use Tax Growth Account to pay the
 costs of extending aid pursuant to this section, the Department of Finance shall certify that fact, in writing, and shall post the certification on its internet website, at which time subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3) shall no longer be implemented.

(h) It is the intent of the Legislature that a county currently participating in the Child Welfare Demonstration Capped Allocation Project not be adversely impacted by the department’s exercise of its option to extend foster care benefits pursuant to Section 673(a)(4) and Section 675(8) of Title 42 of the United States Code in the federal Social Security Act, as contained in the federal Fostering Connections to Success and Increasing Adoptions Act of 2008 (Public Law 110-351). Therefore, the department shall negotiate with the United States Department of Health and Human Services on behalf of those counties that are currently participating in the demonstration project to ensure that those counties receive reimbursement for these new
 programs outside of the provisions of those counties’ waiver under Subtitle IV-E (commencing with Section 470) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 670 et seq.).

(i) The department, on or before July 1, 2013, shall develop regulations to implement this section in consultation with concerned stakeholders, including, but not limited to, representatives of the Legislature, the County Welfare Directors Association of California, the Chief Probation Officers of California, the Judicial Council, representatives of Indian tribes, the California Youth Connection, former foster youth, child advocacy organizations, labor organizations, juvenile justice advocacy organizations, foster caregiver organizations, and researchers. In the development of these regulations, the department shall consider its Manual of Policy and Procedures, Division 30, Chapter 30-912, 913, 916, and 917, as guidelines for developing regulations that are appropriate for young adults who can exercise
 incremental responsibility concurrently with their growth and development. The department, in its consultation with stakeholders, shall take into consideration the impact to the statewide child welfare information system and required modifications needed to accommodate eligibility determination under this section, benefit issuance, case management across counties, and recognition of the legal status of nonminor dependents as adults, as well as changes to data tracking and reporting requirements as required by the Child Welfare System Improvement and Accountability Act as specified in Section 10601.2, and federal outcome measures as required by the federal John H. Chafee Foster Care Independence Program (42 U.S.C. Sec. 677(f)). In addition, the department, in its consultation with stakeholders, shall define the supervised independent living setting, which shall include, but not be limited to, apartment living, room and board arrangements, college or university dormitories, and shared roommate settings, and
 define how those settings meet health and safety standards suitable for nonminors. The department, in its consultation with stakeholders, shall define the six-month certification of the conditions of eligibility pursuant to subdivision (b) to be consistent with the flexibility provided by federal policy guidance, to ensure that there are ample supports for a nonminor to achieve the goals of the nonminor’s transition independent living case plan. The department, in its consultation with stakeholders, shall ensure that notices of action and other forms created to inform the nonminor of due process rights and how to access them shall be developed, using language consistent with the special needs of the nonminor dependent population.

(j) Notwithstanding the Administrative Procedure Act, Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department shall prepare for implementation of the applicable provisions of this section by
 publishing, after consultation with the stakeholders listed in subdivision (i), all-county letters or similar instructions from the director by October 1, 2011, to be effective January 1, 2012. Emergency regulations to implement the applicable provisions of this act may be adopted by the director in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act. The initial adoption of the emergency regulations and one readoption of the emergency regulations are deemed to be an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, safety, or general welfare. Initial emergency regulations and the first readoption of those emergency regulations are exempt from review by the Office of Administrative Law. The emergency regulations authorized by this section shall be submitted to the Office of Administrative Law for filing with the Secretary of State and shall remain in effect for no more than 180 days.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 237, Sec. 3.   (AB 2477)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

11403.01.

On and after January 1, 2012, a nonminor who is receiving Kin-GAP benefits under Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 11360) or Article 4.7 (commencing with Section 11385) and whose Kin-GAP payments began prior to the child’s 16th birthday and who is receiving aid pursuant to those articles, and who is attending high school or the equivalent level of vocational or technical training on a full-time basis, or is in the process of pursuing a high school equivalency certificate, prior to his or her 18th birthday, may continue
 to receive aid under those articles following his or her 18th birthday so long as the child continues to reside in the relative’s home, remains otherwise eligible for Kin-GAP payments, and continues to attend high school or the equivalent level of vocational or technical training on a full-time basis, or continues to pursue a high school equivalency certificate, and the child may reasonably be expected to complete the educational or training program or to receive a high school equivalency certificate, before his or her 19th birthday. Aid shall be provided to an individual pursuant to this section provided that both the individual and the agency responsible for the related guardianship placement have signed a mutual agreement, if the individual is capable of making an informed agreement, documenting the continued need for out-of-home placement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 459, Sec. 35.   (AB 212)   Effective October 4, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

11403.05.

(a) The department shall include all of the following on a flyer for the Independent Living Program created by the department, the form used for a nonminor dependent to enter into a mutual agreement described in subdivision (u) of Section 11400, the form used for a nonminor dependent to enter into a voluntary reentry agreement described in subdivision (z) of Section 11400, the form used to create a transitional independent living plan described in paragraph (16) of subdivision (g) of Section 16501.1, the department’s Internet Web site for the Independent Living Program, and the Office of the State Foster Care Ombudsperson’s Internet Web site:

(1) The voter registration page on the Secretary of State’s Internet Web site.

(2) The toll-free telephone number maintained by the Secretary of State that contains election-related information.

(3) The email address of the Secretary of State.

(b) A county social worker may provide a voter registration form to a child 16 years of age or older or a nonminor dependent concurrent with the provision of a form identified in subdivision (a).

(c) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of an all-county letter or similar instructions, without taking any regulatory action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 92, Sec. 232.   (SB 1289)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

11403.1.

(a) (1) The Legislature finds and declares that former foster youth are a vulnerable population at risk of homelessness, unemployment, welfare dependency, incarceration, and other adverse outcomes if they exit the foster care system unprepared to become self-sufficient. Unlike many young individuals 18 years of age who can depend on family for ongoing support while they complete postsecondary education or develop career opportunities, emancipating foster youth have their primary source of support, AFDC-Foster Care payments, terminated at 18 years of age and are then dependent on their own resources for self-support. Some foster youth are not able to complete high school or other education or training programs due to
 ongoing trauma from the parental abuse or neglect and gaps in their educational attainment stemming from the original removal and subsequent changes in placement.

(2) Completion of an educational or training program is an essential, minimum skill needed by foster youth in order to be competitive in today’s economy.

(3) It is therefore the intent of the Legislature to create, for counties that opt to participate, the Supportive Transitional Emancipation Program (STEP) in which emancipated foster youth may receive support while participating in an educational or training program, or any activity consistent with their transitional independent living plan up to 21 years of age.

(b) Should a county elect to provide this program, a
 person who meets all of the following conditions shall be considered eligible for this program:

(1) The person either was in foster care and emancipated upon reaching the age limitations specified in Section 11401 or received aid pursuant to Kin-GAP under Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 11360) and emancipated upon reaching the age limitations specified in Section 11363.

(2) The person is participating in an educational or training program, or any activity consistent with his or her transitional independent living plan.

(3) The person is under 21 years of age.

(4) The person has emancipated from a county that is participating in the STEP
 program.

(c) Aid under this section may be provided pursuant to a transitional independent living plan mutually agreed upon by the emancipated foster youth and the county welfare or probation department or independent living program coordinator. The youth participating in STEP has the responsibility to inform the county of changes to the conditions in the agreed-upon plan that affect payment of aid, including changes in address, living circumstances, and the educational or training program.

(d) For purposes of this section, “emancipated foster youth” means a person who meets the eligibility criteria in subdivision (b).

(e) (1) In determining the amount of aid under this section, the rate
 provided to the youth shall be equivalent to the basic rate provided pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 11461.

(2) If the emancipated youth remains in placement, payment shall be made to the care provider, including a Transitional Housing Program-Plus provider, at a rate equivalent to the basic rate provided pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 11461.

(f) Unless otherwise provided by federal law, receipt of aid under this section shall not be considered income either for purposes of eligibility for services provided in other federal or state programs, or for grants that may be provided by an institution of higher education, including, but not limited to, Cal Grants or other grants or fee waivers.

(g) (1) Aid under this section shall be provided to eligible youth who have emancipated from a county that elects to participate under this section.

(2) Each participating county welfare department shall notify all foster youth in that county, including those receiving Kin-GAP, ages 16 to 19 years of age, inclusive, of the existence of the program prescribed by this section.

(h) The department shall seek any federal funds available for implementation of this section, including, but not limited to, funds available under Title IV of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 601 et seq.). Implementation of this section shall not, however, be contingent upon receipt of any federal funding. The department shall seek any waiver from the Secretary of the United
 States Department of Health and Human Services that is necessary to implement this section.

(i) Beginning in the 2011–12 fiscal year, and for each fiscal year thereafter, funding and expenditures for programs and activities under this section shall be in accordance with the requirements provided in Sections 30025 and 30026.5 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 732, Sec. 62.   (AB 404)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

11403.2.

(a) The following persons are eligible for transitional housing provided pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 16522) of Chapter 5 of Part 4:

(1) A foster child at least 16 years of age and not more than 18 years of age, and, on or after January 1, 2012, any nonminor dependent, as defined in subdivision (v) of Section 11400, who is eligible for AFDC-FC benefits as described in Section 11401. A foster child under 18 years of age shall be eligible for placement in the program certified as a “Transitional Housing Placement program for minor foster children” pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 16522.1. A nonminor dependent shall be eligible for placement in the program certified as a “Transitional Housing Placement program for nonminor
 dependents” pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 16522.1.

(2) A former foster youth as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 50807 of the Health and Safety Code, who is 18 to 24 years of age, inclusive, who has exited from the foster care system on or after their 18th birthday and elects to participate in Transitional Housing Program-Plus, as defined in subdivision (s) of Section 11400, if the former foster youth has not
 received services under this paragraph for more than a total of 36 months, whether or not consecutive. If the person participating in a Transitional Housing Program-Plus is not receiving aid under Section 11403.1, they, as a condition of participation, shall enter into, and execute the provisions of, a transitional independent living plan that shall be mutually agreed upon, and annually reviewed, by the former foster youth and the applicable county welfare or probation department or independent living program coordinator. The person participating under this paragraph shall inform the county of any changes to conditions specified in the agreed-upon plan that affect eligibility, including changes in address, living circumstances, and the educational or training program.

(b) Payment on behalf of an eligible person receiving transitional housing services pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall be made to the transitional housing placement provider pursuant to the conditions and limitations set forth in Section 11403.3. Notwithstanding Section 11403.3, the department, in consultation with concerned stakeholders, including, but not limited to, representatives of the Legislature, the County Welfare Directors Association of California, the Chief Probation Officers of California, the Judicial Council, representatives of Indian tribes, the California Youth Connection, former foster youth, child advocacy organizations, labor organizations, juvenile justice advocacy organizations, foster caregiver organizations, researchers, and transitional housing placement providers, shall convene a workgroup to establish a new rate structure for the Title IV-E funded Transitional Housing Placement program for nonminor
 dependents placement option for nonminor dependents. The workgroup shall also consider application of this new rate structure to the Transitional Housing Program-Plus, as described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 11403.3. In developing the new rate structure pursuant to this subdivision, the department shall consider the average rates in effect and being paid by counties to current transitional housing placement providers.

(c) The Legislature finds and declares that this subdivision was added in 2015 to clearly codify the requirement of existing law regarding the payment made on behalf of an eligible person receiving transitional housing services. The workgroup described in subdivision (b) recommended, and the department subsequently implemented, an annual adjustment to the payment made on behalf of an eligible person receiving transitional housing services. This annual adjustment has been, and shall continue to be, equal to the
 California Necessities Index applicable to each fiscal year. The Legislature hereby declares that its intent remains in making this annual adjustment to support the care and supervision, including needed services and supports, for nonminor dependents who are receiving transitional housing services through the Transitional Housing Placement program for nonminor dependents.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 50, Sec. 45.   (SB 187)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

11403.3.

(a) Subject to subdivision (b), a transitional housing placement provider, as defined in subdivision (r) of Section 11400, that provides transitional housing services to eligible foster children, as defined by Section 475 of Title IV-E of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 675(8)), and nonminor dependents, as defined by subdivision (v) of Section 11400,
 in a facility licensed pursuant to Section 1559.110 of the Health and Safety Code, shall be paid as follows:

(1) For a program serving foster children who are at least 16 years of age and not more than 18 years of age, a monthly rate that is 75 percent of the average foster care expenditures for foster children 16 to 18 years of age, inclusive, in group home care in the county in which the program operates.

(2) For a program serving nonminor dependents, the rate structure established pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 11403.2.

(b) Payment to a transitional housing placement provider for transitional housing services provided to a person described in subdivision (a) of Section 11403.2 shall be subject to the following conditions:

(1) An amount equal to the base rate, as defined in subdivision (c), shall be paid for transitional housing services provided.

(2) Any additional amount payable pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be contingent on the election by the county placing the youth in the transitional housing placement program to participate in the costs
 of the additional amount, pursuant to subdivision
 (f).

(c) (1) As used in this section, “base rate” means the rate a transitional housing placement provider was approved to receive on June 30, 2001. If a program commences operation after this date, the base rate shall be the rate the program would have received if it had been operational on June 30, 2001.

(2) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a transitional housing placement provider with an approved rate on July 1, 2001, shall not receive a lower rate than its base rate.

(d) Any
 reductions in payments to a transitional housing placement provider pursuant to the implementation of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) shall not preclude the program from acquiring from other sources, additional funding necessary to provide program services.

(e) The department shall develop, implement, and maintain a ratesetting system schedule for transitional housing placement
 providers pursuant to subdivisions (a) to (c), inclusive.

(f) (1) Funding for the rates payable under this section for persons described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 11403.2, prior to the 2011–12 fiscal year, shall be subject to a sharing ratio of 40 percent state and 60 percent county share of nonfederal funds.

(2) Funding for the rates payable under this
 section for persons described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 11403.2, prior to the 2011–12 fiscal year, shall be subject to a sharing ratio of 100 percent state and 0 percent county funds.

(3) Notwithstanding paragraphs (1) and (2), beginning in the 2011–12 fiscal year, and for each fiscal year thereafter, funding and expenditures for programs and activities under this section shall be in accordance with the requirements provided in Sections 30025 and 30026.5 of the Government Code.

(g) The department shall develop, implement, and maintain a ratesetting methodology and rate schedule for providers identified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) by December 31, 2019. Until a new rate schedule is implemented, the rates shall be based on the rates in existence on December 31, 2017, plus the annual adjustment described in subdivision (c) of Section 11403.2.

(h) (1) Subject to an appropriation in the annual Budget Act for this purpose, the rate paid to a transitional housing placement provider serving nonminor dependents shall be supplemented with a housing supplement, which shall be calculated by the department as
 follows:

(A) For nonminor dependents who are custodial parents, the difference between the fair market rent for a one-bedroom apartment in the county in which the nonminor dependent resides and 21.45 percent of the rate established pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 11403.2.

(B) For nonminor dependents who are not custodial parents, the difference between one-half of the fair market rent for a two-bedroom apartment in the county in which the nonminor resides and 21.45 percent of the rate established pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 11403.2.

(2) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the State Department of Social Services shall annually calculate the housing
 supplement described in this subdivision and shall inform county welfare agencies by November 1 of each year of the amount of the supplement by means of all-county letters or similar written instructions. These all-county letters or similar instructions shall have the same force and effect as regulations.

(3) A county shall not receive less than the rate established pursuant to subdivision (h).

(4) For purposes of this subdivision, “fair market rent” means the rent calculated for the fair market rent system developed by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development for use in determining the allowable rent level for individuals who participate in the Housing Choice Voucher program, and that includes the cost of housing and utilities, except for telephone, cable, and internet, and is calculated annually for each county and released at the start of each fiscal year
 by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development.

(5) (A) The department shall work with the County Welfare Directors Association of California and the Statewide Automated Welfare System (CalSAWS) to develop and implement the necessary system changes to implement the housing supplement provided pursuant to paragraph (1).

(B) (i) This supplement shall begin on July 1, 2021, for the counties utilizing the CalWIN system, or when the department notifies the Legislature that CalWIN can perform the necessary automation to implement it, whichever is later.

(ii) This supplement shall begin on September 1, 2022, for the counties utilizing the CalSAWS system, or when the department notifies the Legislature that CalSAWS can perform the necessary automation to implement
 it, whichever is later.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 86, Sec. 38.   (AB 153)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

11404.

(a) Except as provided in Section 11405, a child is not eligible for AFDC-FC unless responsibility for placement and care of the child is with the county welfare department or Indian tribe that entered into an agreement pursuant to Section 10553.1, the county probation department which has an agreement with the county welfare department, or a licensed public adoption agency, licensed private adoption agency, or the department.

(b) In order for the child to be eligible for
 AFDC-FC, the agency with responsibility for the child’s placement and care shall, in accordance with departmental regulations do all of the following:
